Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.060

Bond or certificate of deposit and insurance prerequisite to license—Exemption.

Except as provided in RCW 22.09.405(2), no warehouse or grain dealer license may be issued to an applicant before a bond, certificate of deposit, or other security is given to the department as provided in RCW 22.09.090, or in RCW 22.09.095. No warehouse license may be issued to an applicant before a certificate of insurance as provided in RCW 22.09.110 has been filed with the department. Grain dealers may be exempted by rule from the bonding requirement if the grain dealer does not do more than one hundred thousand dollars in business annually and makes payments solely in coin or currency of the United States at the time of obtaining possession or control of grain. However, a cashier's check, certified check, or bankdraft may be considered as cash for purposes of this section.

[ 1988 c 95 s 2; 1987 c 509 s 1; 1983 c 305 s 24; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 22; 1963 c 124 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 509 s 22.]

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.